Georgia statutes. TITLE 22 Eminent Domain
Article 7 Ownership or Operation of Utility Systems

Cross references.

Acquisition and construction of water and sewage systems, §

36-34-5

.

22-3-140.
Authorization to utilize the declaration of taking method of eminent domain.

Any state agency, political subdivision of the state, county, or municipality owning or operating a sewage collection, treatment, or disposal system, a water or waste-water system, a gas or gas line system, an electrical or electrical line system, or a drain or storm-water system is authorized to utilize the declaration of taking method of eminent domain in order to acquire any private property in fee simple or in any lesser interest, including easements, for such systems and purposes, as such method of eminent domain is provided in Article 1 of Chapter 3 of Title 32. This article and method of eminent domain shall be supplementary to and cumulative of the methods of procedure for the exercise of the power of eminent domain prescribed in this title.

History.

Code 1981, §

22-3-140

, enacted by Ga. L. 2000, p. 1514, § 3.